Washington statutes.
RCW 8.28.030

Notice where military land is involved.

Whenever any land, real estate, premises or other property owned by the state of Washington and used for military purposes shall be involved in or affected by any eminent domain, condemnation, local improvement or other special assessment proceeding whatsoever, in addition to the notices elsewhere provided by law, the officer or board required by law to give notice of such proceedings shall cause to be served upon the adjutant general at least twenty days in advance of any hearing therein, a written notice, setting forth the nature of the proceedings, the description of such state property sought to be involved therein or affected thereby and the amount of the proposed assessment therein.

[ 1917 c 107 s 125; RRS s 8600.]

NOTES:

Condemnation for military purposes: RCW 8.04.170, 8.04.180.